Alabama, session 2026rs, SB32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Section 22-27-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
12 amended to read as follows:
13
14 (a) Generally. (1) The county commission or municipal
15 governing body may, and is hereby authorized to, make
16 available to the general public collection and disposal
17 facilities for solid wastes in a manner acceptable to the
18 department. The county commission or municipal governing body
19 may provide such the collection or disposal services by
20 contract with private or other controlling agencies and may
21 include house-to-house service or the placement of regularly
22 serviced and controlled bulk refuse receptacles within
23 reasonable (generally less than eight miles) distance from the
24 farthest affected household and the wastes managed in a manner
25 acceptable to the department. For purposes of this
26 subdivision, "reasonable distance" means generally less than
27 eight miles.
28 (2) Any county commission or municipal governing body
Page 1

(2) Any county commission or municipal governing body
SB32 Enrolled
29 providing services to the public under this article shall have
30 the power and authority, by resolution or ordinance to, may
31 adopt rules and regulations providing for mandatory public
32 participation in and subscription to such system of services.
33 Such The governing body may, in its discretion, submit the
34 question of requiring such mandatory public participation to a
35 vote of the qualified electors of the county or municipality
36 as the case may be. If such the governing body submits the
37 question to the voters, then the governing body shall also
38 provide for holding and canvassing the returns of the election
39 and for the giving notice thereof for two consecutive weeks in
40 a paper of general circulation in the county or municipality.
41 Every person, household, business, industry, or property
42 generating solid wastes, garbage, or ash as defined in this
43 section shall participate in and subscribe to such the system
44 of service unless granted a certificate of exception as
45 provided in subsection (g). Provided, however, any individual
46 person, household, business, industry, or property generating
47 solid wastes that were which was sharing service for a period
48 of at least 6 six months may continue to share service without
49 filing for a certificate of exception. In the event such a
50 person, household, business, industry, or property owner who
51 has not been granted a certificate of exception refuses to
52 participate in and subscribe to such the system of service,
53 the county commission or municipal governing body may, in
54 addition to any other remedy provided in this article, may
55 bring an appropriate civil action in circuit court to compel
56 such participation and subscription. Except as provided in
Page 2

such participation and subscription. Except as provided in
SB32 Enrolled
57 subsection (g), any person, firm, or corporation violating
58 such rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section
59 shall be in violation of this article and shall be punished as
60 provided in Section 22-27-7.
61 (3)a. Any household whose sole source of income is
62 Social Security benefits or veterans' benefits shall be
63 granted an exemption from the payment of any fees required
64 under this article at any time the household qualifies for an
65 exemption pursuant to this paragraph, provided the household
66 seeking to claim the exemption shall present proof of the
67 household's source of income to the county health officer no
68 later than the first billing date of any year in which the
69 exemption is desired. The county health officer or his or her
70 designee shall forward the exemption request and proof of
71 income to the solid waste officer or municipal governing body
72 upon receipt. The exemption shall apply only so long as the
73 household's sole source of income is Social Security benefits
74 or veterans' benefits and shall be requested each year in
75 which the exemption is desired. Additionally, the Legislature
76 may, by local law, may authorize the county commission to
77 grant additional exemptions to households whose total income
78 does not exceed 75 percent of the federal poverty level. Any
79 person who knowingly provides false or misleading information
80 in order to obtain an exemption shall be subject to the
81 provisions of Section 22-27-7.
82 b. If a household's income is above the current federal
83 poverty level, the exemption for households whose sole source
84 of income is veterans' benefits provided by paragraph a. shall
Page 3

of income is veterans' benefits provided by paragraph a. shall
SB32 Enrolled
85 not apply in any county or municipality unless the county or
86 municipality adopts a resolution providing that the exemption
87 shall apply within the county or municipality for such
88 households.
89 c. For purposes of this subdivision, the term
90 "veterans' benefits" means any benefit, program, service,
91 commodity, function, status, or entitlement that pertains to
92 veterans, their dependents, their survivors, or any other
93 individual eligible for such benefits under the laws,
94 regulations, and rules administered by the United States
95 Department of Veterans Affairs and the Alabama Department of
96 Veterans Affairs.
97 (4) No county commission shall provide solid waste
98 collection and disposal services within the corporate limits
99 of a municipality without the express consent of the municipal
100 governing body of such the municipality nor shall any
101 municipality provide solid waste collection and disposal
102 services outside its corporate limits without the express
103 consent of the county commission of the county in which it is
104 situated.
105 (5) Any county providing door-to-door solid waste
106 collection shall not reduce such the service unless and until
107 a letter has been sent to each resident or property or,
108 business owner, or property owner receiving door to door
109 door-to-door service stating that such the service will be
110 reduced or changed and allowing at least 60 days for any
111 resident, business owner, or property owner to call for a
112 public hearing and for the county or municipality to hold such
Page 4

public hearing and for the county or municipality to hold such
SB32 Enrolled
113 a public hearing upon request.
114 (6) Any provision of this article to the contrary
115 notwithstanding, no person, household, business, industry, or
116 property owner shall be required to pay any solid waste
117 collection exemption or disposal fee chargeable under this
118 article unless solid waste collection and disposal services
119 for which such the charge was made were actually made
120 available to such the person, household, business, industry,
121 or property owner.
122 (b) Solid waste officer. As used in this article, the
123 term "solid waste officer" shall mean means any county
124 official or county employee or any official or employee of a
125 solid waste disposal authority authorized under Section
126 11-89A-1 et seq. Chapter 89A of Title 11 designated by the
127 county commission to exercise the authority and perform the
128 duties delegated by this article to such official and such the
129 officer. The officer shall have the same powers of enforcement
130 against persons violating this article as do license
131 inspectors with regard to persons violating revenue laws as
132 provided under Section 40-12-10 (i), (j), (k), and (n).
133 (c) As used in this article, the terms "solid wastes",
134 "garbage", "solid wastes," "garbage," and "ash" do not include
135 any drilling discharges from oil or natural gas operations.
136 (d) Garbage disposal. Garbage and rubbish containing
137 garbage shall be disposed of by sanitary landfill, approved
138 incineration, composting, or by other means as now available
139 or which as may later become available as approved by the
140 department. The method chosen and used shall also meet the
Page 5

department. The method chosen and used shall also meet the
SB32 Enrolled
141 requirements of the health department for sanitation and the
142 protection of public health.
143 (e) Burning. No garbage or rubbish containing garbage
144 or other putrescible materials or hazardous wastes shall be
145 burned except in approved incinerators meeting the necessary
146 temperature requirements and air pollution controls as now
147 established or as may later be established. The open burning
148 of rubbish shall be permitted only under sharply controlled
149 circumstances where sanitary landfill or landfill is not
150 feasible and not in proximity to sanitary landfill or landfill
151 operations where the spread of fire to these operations may be
152 a hazard in the opinion of the department.
153 (f) Haulage. Trucks or other vehicles engaged in the
154 business of hauling garbage and rubbish shall be so covered,
155 secured, or sealed that there will be no loss during haulage
156 to cause littering of streets and highways, or cause a
157 nuisance or hazard to the public health.
158 (g) Exception. (1)a. A person, household, business,
159 industry, or any property owner may store, haul, and dispose
160 of his or her own solid wastes on his or her land or
161 otherwise, provided such the storage, haulage, or disposal is
162 accomplished pursuant to a certificate of exception as
163 provided in this subsection. In order to obtain a certificate
164 of exception, an application, an application fee, and a plan
165 must be filed with the county health officer or his or her
166 designee in the case of household solid waste or with the
167 department in the case of solid waste from a business or
168 industry, setting out the proposed method of storing, hauling,
Page 6

industry, setting out the proposed method of storing, hauling,
SB32 Enrolled
169 and disposing of solid waste so as to comply with rules and
170 regulations adopted by the state or county boards of health or
171 the department as appropriate and not create a public nuisance
172 or hazard to the public health.
173 b. The certification of exception application fee shall
174 be established by the State Board Committee of Public Health
175 or the department, as the case may be, except that with regard
176 to an individual household such, the fee shall be ten dollars
177 ($10). The proceeds from such application the fees are hereby
178 shall be appropriated to the State Board Committee of Public
179 Health or the department, as the case may be, to be used for
180 the administration of this article.
181 c. The county health officer, or his or her designee,
182 or the department, as appropriate, shall investigate such the
183 application and plan and issue a certificate of exception
184 within the time set by the State Board Committee of Public
185 Health or the department, as the case may be (, not to exceed
186 sixty 60 days in the case of an individual household), if such
187 the proposal will, in such the officer's or, designee's, or
188 the department's judgment, comply with such the rules and
189 regulations and adequately prevent a public nuisance or hazard
190 to public health. A certificate of exception granted under
191 authority of this section subsection shall be valid for the
192 period established by the department, except that in the case
193 of an individual household such, the period shall not exceed
194 one year. The county health officer, or his or her designee,
195 or the department shall notify the county commission or
196 municipal governing body in writing of the intention to grant
Page 7

municipal governing body in writing of the intention to grant
SB32 Enrolled
197 a certificate of exception and no such. No certificate of
198 exception shall be granted for an individual household without
199 prior written approval of the county commission or municipal
200 governing body, as the case may be.
201 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
202 to the contrary, no exception, exception fee, or any other
203 review, approval, or payment shall be required of any
204 generator for the collection, handling, or disposal of its own
205 solid waste using facilities or equipment owned by the
206 generator, its corporate parent, affiliate, or subsidiary and
207 duly permitted for such use by the Alabama Department of
208 Environmental Management department or its successor in
209 function.
210 (h) Coal combustion by-products. Upon the adoption and
211 implementation of a federal regulatory program to govern the
212 disposal of coal combustion by-products pursuant in whole or
213 in part to Subtitle D of the Solid Waste Disposal Act, 42
214 U.S.C. § 6941 et seq., the department is authorized to develop
215 and may adopt rules as necessary to implement a state
216 regulatory program consistent with the federal requirements.
217 Until such the federal program requirements take effect, the
218 disposal of coal combustion by-products shall be subject to
219 the applicable requirements of this article;, provided,
220 however, that a facility permitted by the department pursuant
221 to Chapter 22 of this title as of May 25, 2011, and thereafter
222 may continue to operate without additional authorization by
223 the department until federal requirements under the Solid
224 Waste Disposal Act take effect. To the extent permissible
Page 8

Waste Disposal Act take effect. To the extent permissible
SB32 Enrolled
225 under the federal program, the department shall allow
226 beneficial uses of coal combustion by-products as an
227 alternative to disposal as part of any adopted state program."
228 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
229 1, 2026.
Page 9

1, 2026.
SB32 Enrolled
230
231
232
233
234
235
236 ________________________________________________
237 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
238
239
240
241 ________________________________________________
242 Speaker of the House of Representatives
243
244
245 SB32
246 Senate 03-Mar-26
247 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
248 the Senate.
249
250 Senate 09-Apr-26
251 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
252 the Senate, as amended by Conference Committee Report.
253
254 Patrick Harris,
255 Secretary.
256
257
258
259
260 House of Representatives
261 Passed: 02-Apr-26, as amended.
262
263 House of Representatives
264 Passed: 09-Apr-26, as amended by Conference Committee Report.
265
266
267
268
269 By: Senator Kitchens
Page 10